Wyoming, session 2026, SF0110.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-101(a)(xvii) by creating a new
subparagraph (C), by renumbering (C) as (D) and by creating
a new paragraph (xix), 39-13-103(b)(iii) by creating a new
SF0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0431
subparagraph (C) and by renumbering (C) as (D) and
39-13-104(d)(i) are amended to read:

39-11-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:

(xvii) "Taxable value" means a percent of the
fair market value of property in a particular class as
follows:

(C) Residential real property as follows:

(I) An owner occupied primary
residence, eight and three-tenths percent (8.3%);

(II) All other residential real
property, nine and one-half percent (9.5%).

(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, including property valued and assessed under W.S.
SF0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0431
39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix), nine and one-half percent
(9.5%).

(xix) Owner occupied primary residence" means
residential real property where the owner of the property
resides for not less than six (6) months of the applicable
tax year;

(xx) "Residential real property" means real
property improved by a dwelling designed to house not more
than three (3) families and includes associated residential
land where the dwelling is located if the land is owned by
the owner of the dwelling. The dwelling may be any type of
dwelling including a single family home or an individual
condominium unit if the dwelling is used as a residence.

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(iii) Beginning January 1, 1989, "taxable value"
means a percent of the fair market value of property in a
particular class as follows:
SF0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0431

(C) Residential real property as follows:

(I) An owner occupied primary
residence, eight and three-tenths percent (8.3%);

(II) All other residential real
property, nine and one-half percent (9.5%).

(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, nine and one-half percent (9.5%).

39-13-104. Taxation rate.

(d) There shall be annually levied and assessed upon
the taxable value of property within the limits of Wyoming
school districts the following school taxes when
applicable:

(i) Not to exceed the number of mills provided
by W.S. 21-13-102, provided that zero (0) mills shall be
assessed on residential real property under this paragraph
if the owner of the residential real property submits a
SF0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0431
claim to the county assessor not later than the fourth
Monday in May each year on forms provided by the department
of revenue demonstrating that the person is the owner of
the property and that the property is the person's primary
residence;

Section 2. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi) is repealed.

Section 3. This act shall first apply to the tax year
beginning January 1, 2027.

Section 4. This act is effective January 1, 2027.

(END)
SF0110